Louisiana, session 2026, HB308.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 3 of Subtitle I of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 39:441, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 3. PAYMENTS ACCEPTED AT CERTAIN PUBLIC FACILITIES
§441. Required acceptance of certain payment types at state-owned facilities
A. As used in this Chapter, the following terms shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Cash" means legal tender of the United States in the form of coins or
currency.
(2) "Corporeal" shall have the same meaning as in Civil Code Article 461.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 308 ENROLLED
(3) "Customer" means any person who uses, purchases, or leases goods or
services.
(4) "Incorporeal" shall have the same meaning as in Civil Code Article 461.
(5) "Public facility" means a stadium facility owned by the state or any of
its instrumentalities, agencies, boards, or commissions that is normally used for
athletic or entertainment events, activities, or enterprises. The term shall include but
not be limited to the Louisiana Superdome, the Smoothie King Center, and Louisiana
State University's Tiger Stadium.
B.(1) Each public facility shall accept an offer of payment in cash for any
transaction involving the purchase of any corporeal or incorporeal if, in connection
with such transaction, the public facility would accept one or more other forms of
payment for the same purchase and the customer seeking to engage in the transaction
is physically present at the public facility.
(2) An entity owning a public facility may satisfy the requirement in
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection by having available on site a cash-to-card kiosk into
which a customer deposits cash and is given a debit card loaded with the amount
deposited. The customer may use the debit card to complete a transaction at the
public facility.
(3) An entity owning a public facility may not charge a fee or place any other
condition on its acceptance of cash as required pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection.
C. The provisions of this Chapter shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) Sales that are not conducted in person, including telephone, mail, and
internet-based or other electronic transactions.
(2) Sales in which the entity suspects the use of counterfeit cash.
(3) The use of cash denominations larger than twenty dollars by a customer.
(4) Single transactions above five thousand dollars.
(5) Transactions related to parking at the public facility.
D. The provisions of this Chapter shall apply to transactions initiated on or
after July 1, 2027.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 308 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.